Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.806

Exemption—Solicitation for Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

This chapter does not prohibit the members of the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall selection committee, members of the legislature, when outside the period in which solicitation of contributions is prohibited by RCW 42.17A.560, or employees of the Washington state historical society from soliciting contributions for the purposes established in chapter 20, Laws of 2021, and for deposit into the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund created in RCW 43.08.800.

[ 2023 c 387 s 4.]

PDFRCW 42.52.806

Exemption—Solicitation for Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

This chapter does not prohibit the members of the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall selection committee, members of the legislature, when outside the period in which solicitation of contributions is prohibited by RCW 29B.45.020, or employees of the Washington state historical society from soliciting contributions for the purposes established in chapter 20, Laws of 2021, and for deposit into the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund created in RCW 43.08.800.

[ 2024 c 164 s 519; 2023 c 387 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.